Utah statutes.
57-11-14.   Revocation, suspension, or denial of registration -- Grounds -- Suspension or revocation of license.

(1) (a)  If the division makes a written finding of fact that a subdivider engages in one or more acts described in Subsection (1)(b), the division may:

(i)  deny an application for registration;

(ii)  revoke, suspend, or deny reissuance of a registration; or

(iii)  impose a civil penalty not to exceed the greater of:

(A)  $2,500 for each violation; or

(B)  the amount of any gain or economic benefit derived from each violation.

(b)  Subsection (1)(a) applies if the division makes a written finding of fact that a subdivider:

(i)  fails to comply with the terms of a cease and desist order;

(ii)  is convicted in a court prior or subsequent to the filing of the application for registration of a crime involving:

(A)  fraud;

(B)  deception;

(C)  false pretenses;

(D)  misrepresentation;

(E)  false advertising; or

(F)  dishonest dealing in real estate transactions;

(iii)  is subject to an injunction or administrative order restraining a false or misleading promotional plan involving land dispositions;

(iv)  disposes of, conceals, or diverts funds or assets of any person so as to defeat the rights of subdivision purchasers;

(v)  fails to perform faithfully a stipulation or agreement made with the division as an inducement to:

(A)  grant a registration;

(B)  reinstate a registration;

(C)  revoke a cease and desist order; or

(D)  approve any promotional plan or public offering statement;

(vi)  makes an intentional misrepresentation, or conceals a material fact, in an application for registration;

(vii)  violates this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;

(viii)  directly or through an agent or employee knowingly engages in false, deceptive, or misleading advertising, promotional, or sales methods to offer or dispose of an interest in subdivided lands;

(ix)  engages in the offering of subdivided lands that has constituted or that may constitute a fraud upon purchasers or prospective purchasers of the subdivided lands; or

(x)  engages in a dishonest practice in any industry involving sales to consumers.

(c)  The division shall accompany with a finding of fact required by this Subsection (1) a concise and explicit statement of the underlying facts supporting the finding.

(2)  As an alternative to revoking the registration of a subdivider, the director may issue a cease and desist order if after notice and a hearing the director finds that the subdivider is guilty of a violation for which revocation may be ordered.

(3) (a)  The division shall suspend or revoke the license of a principal broker, associate broker, or sales agent who violates this chapter for the period of time the director determines to be justified under the circumstances.

(b)  A suspension or revocation under this section is in addition to any other penalty that may be imposed under this chapter, subject to Section 61-2f-404.

